en: spearmint
af: kruisement
ar: نعناع مدبب
az: sünbüllü nanə
bg: джоджен
bn: পুদিনা
ca: menta verda
cs: máta klasnatá
cy: mintys ysbigog
da: grøn mynte
de: grüne Minze
el: δυόσμος
es: menta verde
et: rohemünt
eu: mendabeltz
fa: نعناع زینتی
fi: viherminttu
fr: menthe verte
ga: cartlainn gharraí
gl: hortelá verde
he: נענע קרחת
hr: zelene metvice
hu: fodormenta
it: menta spicata, menta romana, menta gentile
ja: スペアミント
ko: 스피어민트
ku: nane
la: Mentha spicata
lt: šaltmėtė
nl: aarmunt, groene munt
pl: mięta zielona
pt: hortelã-verde
qu: ispiha muña
ru: мята колосистая
se: ruonáminta
sk: mäta klasnatá
sl: klasasta meta
sv: spearmint, grönmynta
te: పుదీనా
th: สเปียร์มินต์
uk: м'ята кучерява
zh: 留蘭香

en: peppermint
ar: نعناع فلفلي
ba: бөтнөк үләне
ca: menta pebrera
cs: máta peprná
cy: mintys poeth
da: pebermynte
de: Pfefferminz, Pfefferminze
el: μέντα η πεπερώδης, ηδύοσμος ο πεπερώδης
eo: pipromento
es: menta piperita, piperita
et: piparmünt
eu: mendafin
fa: نعنای فلفلی
fi: piparminttu
fr: menthe poivrée
ga: lus an phiobair
gl: menta común
he: נענע חריפה
hi: पिपरमिंट
hr: paprena metvica, paprene metvice, divlje metvice
hu: borsmenta
hy: անանուխ
id: pepermin
is: piparminta
it: menta piperita
ja: ペパーミント
kk: бұрышты жалбыз
ko: 박하
la: mentha piperita
lt: pipirmėtė
lv: piparmētra
ms: pudina
nb: peppermynte
nl: pepermunt
pl: mięta pieprzowa, mięty pieprzowej
ps: تور ويلني
pt: hortelã-pimenta
ro: izmă bună
ru: мята перечная
sh: pitoma metvica
si: ڦودنو
sk: mäta pieporná
sl: poprova meta
sr: питома нана
sv: pepparmynta
ta: மிளகுக்கீரை
tg: наъно
th: เปปเปอร์มินต์
tr: bahçe nanesi
uk: м'ята перцева
vi: bạc hà
zh: 胡椒薄荷

en: peppermint leaf, peppermint leaves
de: Pfefferminzblätter, Pfefferminzblätter ganz
fr: feuilles de menthe poivrée, feuilles de menthe poivrée entières
hr: list paprene metvice
it: foglia di menta piperita
pl: liść mięty pieprzowej, liście mięty pieprzowej, ziele mięty pieprzowej

en: concentrated peppermint juice
fr: jus concentré de menthe poivrée
it: succo di menta piperita concentrato

en: peppermint oil
ar: زيت النعناع
bg: масло от дива мента
da: pebermynteolie, pebermynte olie
de: Pfefferminzöl
el: αιθέριο έλαιο μέντας
et: piparmündiõli
fi: piparminttuöljy
fr: huile de menthe poivrée
he: שמן מנטה חריפה
hr: ulje peperminta
hu: borsosmentaolaj
it: olio di menta piperita
lt: pipirmečių aliejus
nl: pepermuntolie
nn: pebermynte olie
pl: olejek z mięty pieprzowej
pt: óleo de hortelã-pimenta
ru: масло мяты перечной
sv: pepparmintolja, pebermynte olie

en: sweetmint
el: γλυκιά μέντα
fr: menthe douce
hr: slatka metvica
it: menta dolce
pt: hortelã-comum

en: Perilla
it: perilla
ja: シソ属

en: Shiso, beefsteak plant
it: shiso
ja: シソ, 紫蘇, しそ

en: Red shiso
it: shiso rosso
ja: アカジソ, 赤紫蘇, 赤じそ, 赤ジソ

en: Green shiso
it: shiso verde
ja: アオジソ, 青紫蘇, 青じそ, 青ジソ, 大葉

en: perilla oil, perilla seed oil
de: Perillaöl
es: aceite de perilla

en: sumac
ar: سماق
az: sumaq
be: сумах, сумак
bg: сумак
ca: sumac
cs: sumah
da: sumak
de: Sumak
el: σουμάκι
eo: sumako
es: sumac, zumaque
eu: zumake
fi: sumakit
fr: sumac
ga: sumach
gl: sumagre
he: סומאק
hr: ruj
hy: աղտոր
id: sumac
io: sumako
it: sommacco
ja: スマック
jv: sumac
ku: simaq
lt: žagrenis
nl: sumak, zuurkruid
nv: kʼįįʼ
pl: sumak, sumaku
ru: сумак
sv: sumak, sumac
tr: sumak
uk: сумах

en: summer savory, savory
bg: ронена чубрица
da: sar
de: Bohnenkraut
es: ajedrea
fr: sariette, sarriette
hr: ljetni ukusan
it: santoreggia
nl: bonenkruid
pl: cząber, cząbru
ro: cimbru
sv: kyndel

en: tarragon
af: draakplant
ar: طرخون
az: tərxun
be: эстрагон
bg: естрагон
bn: তার্খুন
br: stragon
bs: estragon
ca: estragó
cs: estragon
cy: taragon
da: estragon
de: estragon
el: εστραγκόν
eo: estragono
es: dragón, estragon
et: estragon
eu: binagrera
fa: ترخون
fi: rakuuna
fr: estragon
ga: dragan
gl: estragón
gv: dragane
he: לַעֲנָה
hr: zmijina trava
hu: tárkony
hy: թարխուն
id: tarragon
io: estragono
it: dragoncello
ja: タラゴン
ka: ტარხუნა
kk: шырғалжың
ko: 타라곤
ku: tarxûn
la: artemisia dracunculus
lt: estragonas
mk: естрагон
ms: taragon
nb: estragon, estragonblader
nl: dragon
nn: estragon, estragonblader
no: estragon, estragonblader
oc: estragon
os: мæзæрæу
pa: ਤਰਖ਼ੋਨ
pl: draganek, estragon, estragonu
pt: estragão
ro: tarhon
ru: эстрагон
sk: estragón
sl: pehtran
sq: terragoni
sr: естрагон
sv: dragon
tr: tarhun
uk: тархун
uz: sherolgʻin
zh: 龍蒿

en: thyme
ar: الزعتر
bg: мащерка
ca: farigola
cs: tymián
cy: teim
da: timian
de: Thymian
el: θυμάρι
es: tomillo
et: tüümian
fa: تایم
fi: timjami
fr: thym
hr: timijan, majčina dušica
hu: kakukkfű, kaukkfű
id: thyme
it: timo
ja: タイム
kk: жебір
kn: ಟೈಮ್
ko: 백리향
la: thymus vulgaris
lt: čiobrelis
lv: timiāns
ml: തോട്ടതുളസി
nb: timian
nl: tijm, thijm
nn: timian
or: ଦଅଣା
pa: ਅਜਵਾਇਣ
pl: tymianek, tymianku, tymiankowe, tymiankowy, tymiankowa
pt: tomilho
ro: cimbru de câmp
ru: тимьян
sv: timjan
tr: kekik
zh: 麝香草

en: thyme sprig
fr: brin de thym, branche de thym

en: dried thyme
de: getrockneter Thymian, Thymian getrocknet
es: tomillo deshidratado, tomillo seco
fi: kuivattu timjami
fr: thym déshydraté, thym deshydrate

en: verbena, vervain
ab: Адәыҳәымсаг
ar: رعي الحمام الطبي
az: Dərman minaçiçəyi
bg: върбинка
ca: berbena
cs: sporýš lékařský
cy: Y ferfain
da: Læge-Jernurt
de: Eisenkraut
es: verbena
et: Harilik raudürt
eu: Berbena
fa: وربنا آفیسینالیس
fi: rohtorautayrtti, rohtoverbena
fr: verveine, verveine odorante
gl: Verxebán
gv: Vervine
hr: vrbena
hu: Közönséges vasfű
it: verbena
ja: クマツヅラ
kk: Дәрілік нарқайсар
ko: 마편초
lt: Vaistinė verbena
nl: ijzerhard, verbena
pl: Werbena, werbeny
ru: Вербена лекарственная
rw: Umugosora
sk: železník lekársky
sw: Järnört
uk: Вербена лікарська
zh: 马鞭草

en: organic verbena
fi: luomu rohtorautayrtti
fr: verveine bio
hr: organska verbena
it: verbena biologica
nl: biologisch ijzerhard

fr: feuilles de verveine
de: verbenenblätter
es: hojas de verbena
it: foglie di verbena
nl: verveinebladeren